Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1708
Commodity Futures Trading Commission, defined.

Commodity Futures Trading Commission shall mean the independent regulatory agency established by Congress to administer the Commodity Exchange Act.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 8.